Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF694.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [145.665] VACCINE RECIPIENT BILL OF RIGHTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Purposes; public policy. new text end new text begin The purposes of this section are to defend the constitutional liberties of Minnesota residents, promote the provision of vaccine information to vaccine recipients, ensure vaccines are provided only after the provision of informed consent, and promote sound science. It is declared to be the public policy of this state to protect the interests of each vaccine recipient by establishing a vaccine recipient bill of rights that includes but is not limited to the rights specified in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Determination of individual's medical interest. new text end new text begin An individual shall reserve the right, at all times, to determine what is in the individual's own best medical interest regarding obtaining or not obtaining vaccines without threat to the individual's livelihood, ability to attend school, or freedom of movement. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Disclosure of specific vaccine being administered. new text end new text begin A health care provider administering a vaccine must disclose to each vaccine recipient the specific vaccine being administered to the recipient. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Information about vaccines. new text end new text begin Before consenting to a vaccine, an individual must be given access to information about the vaccine being offered to allow the individual to determine whether obtaining the vaccine is in the individual's medical interest. Vaccine information to which the individual is given access must include independent information from sources other than vaccine manufacturers, governmental entities, or quasi-governmental entities. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Consultation with advocate. new text end new text begin Before consenting to a vaccine, an individual who is over age 65 and is dependent on others for activities of daily living is entitled to consult with a knowledgeable, independent advocate with medical training to help the individual determine whether obtaining the vaccine is in the individual's medical interest. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Experimental or investigational vaccines. new text end new text begin No individual shall be required, coerced, forced, or pressured to obtain an experimental or investigational vaccine. For purposes of this subdivision, "experimental or investigational vaccine" means a vaccine that is not approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration but includes a vaccine authorized for use according to an emergency use authorization. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Promotion of COVID-19 vaccine. new text end new text begin No employer shall ask a health care provider to promote a COVID-19 vaccine. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Vaccine adverse events reporting system. new text end new text begin All health care providers must educate themselves regarding the vaccine adverse events reporting system run by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the Food and Drug Administration, check the system regularly, and provide each vaccine recipient with information on the system. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Private businesses. new text end new text begin A private business operating in Minnesota is prohibited from requiring an individual to obtain a vaccine, unless the private business is authorized or required to do so under other law. A private business operating in Minnesota is prohibited from coercing an individual to obtain a vaccine. new text end